District of Columbia statutes.
31-2231.18

Failure to maintain complaint handling procedures.

An insurer shall maintain a complete record of all complaints which it has received since the date of its last examination as otherwise required in this chapter. The record shall indicate the total number of complaints, their classification by line of insurance, the nature of each complaint, the disposition of each complaint, and the time to process each complaint. For purposes of the section, the term “complaint” shall mean a written communication from a policyholder, subscriber, claimant, or insurance department primarily expressing a grievance.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-265, § 118, 48 DCR 1225